Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,111
Severability.

If any one or more provisions, sections,
subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words of the Pain-Capable Unborn
Child Protection Act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance
is found to be unconstitutional, the same is hereby declared to be severable
and the balance of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act shall remain
effective notwithstanding such unconstitutionality. The Legislature hereby
declares that it would have passed the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection
Act, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or
word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provisions, sections,
subsections, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words of the Pain-Capable Unborn
Child Protection Act, or the application of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child
Protection Act, would be declared unconstitutional.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 10.